Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202018-2445
Emergencies; conditions created by war; contracting requirements inapplicable; Nebraska workers preferred; bonds; laws applicable.

(1) In the event of sudden or unexpected damage, injury, or impairment of such project, plant, works, system, or other property belonging to the agency, or an order of a regulatory body which would prevent compliance with section 18-2442, the board of directors may, in its discretion, declare an emergency, and proceed with the necessary construction, reconstruction, remodeling, building, alteration, maintenance, repair, extension, or improvement without first complying with the provisions of sections 18-2442 to 18-2444.

(2) When, by reason of disturbed or disrupted economic conditions due to war or due to the operation of laws, rules, or regulations of governmental authorities, whether enacted, passed, promulgated, or issued under or due to the emergency or necessities of war or national defense, the contracting or purchasing by the agency is so restricted, prohibited, limited, allocated, regulated, rationed, or otherwise controlled, that the letting of contracts therefor, pursuant to the requirements of such sections, is legally or physically impossible or impractical, sections 18-2442 to 18-2444 shall not apply to such contracts or purchases.

(3) Such contract shall provide that, to the extent practicable, workers who are citizens of Nebraska shall be given preference for employment by the contractor.

(4) Section 52-118, with reference to contractors' bonds, shall be applicable and effective as to any contract let pursuant to the Municipal Cooperative Financing Act, except that for any electric generation facility the penal sum of any contractor's bond shall be the lesser of the contract amount or two hundred million dollars. The bond required by section 52-118 may be satisfied by a corporate surety bond or letter of credit, or a combination thereof, as approved by the agency.

Laws 1981, LB 132, § 45;

Laws 2020, LB858, § 10.
August 7, 2020